Washington statutes.
RCW 9A.28.030

Criminal solicitation.

(1) A person is guilty of criminal solicitation when, with intent to promote or facilitate the commission of a crime, he or she offers to give or gives money or other thing of value to another to engage in specific conduct which would constitute such crime or which would establish complicity of such other person in its commission or attempted commission had such crime been attempted or committed.

(2) Criminal solicitation shall be punished in the same manner as criminal attempt under RCW 9A.28.020.

[ 2011 c 336 s 356; 1975 1st ex.s. c 260 s 9A.28.030.]